Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.200

Definitions.

For the purposes of RCW 23.86.200 through 23.86.230 a "domestic" cooperative association or "domestic" corporation is one formed under the laws of this state, and an "ordinary business" corporation is one formed or which could be formed under Title 23B RCW.

[ 1991 c 72 s 17; 1971 ex.s. c 221 s 1.]